Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2129.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2318 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 2318. Expiration.(a) Notice.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall, upon the imposition of a severance tax on unconventional gas wells in this Commonwealth, submit for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin notice of the imposition.(b) Date.--This chapter shall expire on the date of the publication of the notice under subsection (a).]Section 2. Title 58 is amended by adding a part to read:PART IVTAXATION123456789101112131415161718 Chapter41. (Reserved)43. Severance TaxCHAPTER 41(Reserved)CHAPTER 43SEVERANCE TAXSec.4301. Scope of chapter.4302. Definitions.4303. Imposition of tax.4304. Impact fee credits.4305. Registration.4306. Meters.4307. Assessments.4308. Time for assessment.4309. Extension of assessment period.4310. Reassessments.4311. Interest.4312. Penalties.4313. Administration of tax.4314. Criminal acts.4315. Abatement of additions or penalties.4316. Bulk and auction sales.4317. Collection upon failure to request reassessment, review or appeal.4318. Tax liens.4319. Tax suit reciprocity.4320. Service.4321. Refunds.20260HB2129PN2755 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 4322. Refund petition.4323. Rules and regulations.4324. Recordkeeping.4325. Examinations.4326. Unauthorized disclosure.4327. Cooperation with other governments.4328. Bonds.4329. Prohibition.4330. Future agreements.4331. Stripper wells.4332. Deposit of proceeds.§ 4301. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to taxation of the severance of natural gas.§ 4302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Mcf." A unit of measurement expressed by 1,000 cubic feet."Natural gas." As defined in section 2301 (relating to definitions)."Person." A natural person, corporation, fiduciary, association or other entity. The term includes the Commonwealth and any political subdivision, instrumentality and authority of the Commonwealth."Producer." As defined in section 2301."Reporting period." A calendar month in which natural gas is severed."Secretary." The Secretary of Revenue of the Commonwealth.20260HB2129PN2755 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Sever." Extract or otherwise remove natural gas from the soil or water of this Commonwealth."Storage field." A natural formation or other site that is used to store natural gas that did not originate from and has been transplanted into the formation or site."Stripper well." A natural gas well incapable of producing more than 90 units of natural gas each day of the calendar month immediately preceding the reporting period, including production from all zones and multilateral well bores at a single well, without regard to whether the production is separately metered."Trigger date." The date that is 60 days after the effective date of this section."Unconventional gas well." As defined in section 2301."Unit." One thousand cubic feet of natural gas measured at the wellhead at a temperature of 60 º Fahrenheit and an absolute pressure of 14.73 pounds per square inch in accordance with American Gas Association standards and according to Boyle's law for the measurement of gas under varying pressures with deviations as follows:(1) The average absolute atmospheric pressure shall be assumed to be 14.4 pounds to the square inch, regardless of elevation or location of point of delivery above sea level or variations in atmospheric pressure.(2) The temperature of the gas passing the meters shall be determined by the continuous use of a recording thermometer installed to properly record the temperature of gas flowing through the meters. The arithmetic average of the temperature recorded each 24-hour day shall be used in computing gas volumes. If a recording thermometer is not installed, or is installed and not operating properly, an 20260HB2129PN2755 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 average flowing temperature of 60 º Fahrenheit shall be used in computing gas volume.(3) The specific gravity of the gas shall be determined annually by tests made by the use of an Edwards or Acme gravity balance, or at intervals as found necessary in practice. Specific gravity determinations shall be used in computing gas volumes.(4) The deviation of the natural gas from Boyle's law shall be determined by annual tests or at other shorter intervals as found necessary in practice. The apparatus and method used in making the test shall be in accordance with recommendations of the National Institute of Standards and Technology or Report No. 3 of the Gas Measurement Committee of the American Gas Association. The results of the tests shall be used in computing the volume of gas delivered under this chapter."Wellhead meter." A meter that measures the volume of natural gas severed from an unconventional gas well.§ 4303. Imposition of tax.(a) Establishment.--Beginning July 1 in the year following the effective date of this section, a natural gas severance tax is levied and payable by every producer on each unconventional gas well.(b) Effect.-- The imposition of the severance tax under subsection (a) shall not affect the collection and distribution of the unconventional gas well fee imposed under Chapter 23 (relating to unconventional gas well fee).(c) Computation.--The severance tax payable under subsection (a) shall be calculated by applying the sum of the base tax rate under subsection (d) and the additional tax rate under 20260HB2129PN2755 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (e) to the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(d) Base tax rate.--The base tax rate under this section shall be 9% of the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(e) Additional tax rate.--In addition to the base tax rate under subsection (d), an additional tax rate shall apply as follows:(1) If exports of natural gas from the United States, as calculated by the United States Energy Information Administration, for the imposition period for which the severance tax is owed are greater than or equal to 4,000,000 mcf but less than 6,000,000 mcf, the additional tax rate shall be 0.5% of the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(2) If exports of natural gas from the United States, as calculated by the United States Energy Information Administration, for the imposition period for which the severance tax is owed are greater than or equal to 6,000,000 mcf but less than 8,000,000 mcf, the additional tax rate shall be 1% of the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(3) If exports of natural gas from the United States, as calculated by the United States Energy Information Administration, for the imposition period for which the severance tax is owed are greater than or equal to 8,000,000 mcf but less than 10,000,000 mcf, the additional tax rate shall be 1.5% of the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(4) If exports of natural gas from the United States, as 20260HB2129PN2755 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 calculated by the United States Energy Information Administration, for the imposition period for which the severance tax is owed are greater than or equal to 10,000,000 mcf, the additional tax rate shall be 2% of the annual market value of natural gas per unit severed after deduction of postproduction costs.(f) Payment.--The severance tax imposed under this section shall be due on the same day the report is due under subsection (g). The tax shall become delinquent if not remitted to the department on the reporting date.(g) Report.--Each producer shall, by June 30 of the first fiscal year in which the severance tax is imposed and by June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter, submit to the department the payment of the severance tax and a report for the imposition period on a form specified by the department.(h) Exemptions.--The severance tax imposed under this section shall not be imposed on the following:(1) natural gas severed, sold and delivered by a producer at or within five miles of the producing site for the processing or manufacture of tangible personal property as defined under section 201 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971;(2) natural gas severed under a natural gas lease and provided to a lessor for no consideration for the lessor's own use;(3) natural gas severed from a storage field; or(4) a stripper well.(i) Volume measurement.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), for purposes of computing the severance tax, natural gas severed shall be 20260HB2129PN2755 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 measured at the wellhead meter.(2) Natural gas severed prior to the trigger date shall be measured according to the standards and methods used for reporting natural gas production to the Department of Environmental Protection.(j) Administration.--The department shall enforce the provisions of this section and may prescribe, adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations relating to any matter or thing pertaining to the administration or enforcement of the provisions of this section and the collection of taxes imposed by this section.(k) Payment of tax.--A producer may not make the tax imposed under this section on natural gas severed under a lease an obligation, indebtedness or liability of the lessor and may not otherwise require the lessor to reimburse the producer for the amount of the tax.§ 4304. Impact fee credits.(a) Credits.--Unconventional gas well fees timely paid by a producer for the prior calendar year under Chapter 23 (relating to unconventional gas well fee) shall be allowed as credit against the tax imposed under this chapter.(b) Initial credit.--The initial credit under subsection (a) shall be prorated based on the number of months in which this chapter was effective during the calendar year for which the unconventional gas well fee was paid. Thereafter, the credit shall be based on the entire unconventional gas well fee paid by a producer on or before April 1 for the preceding calendar year.(c) Carry back and forward.--A credit under this section may not be carried back or carried forward beyond 12 months after payment of the unconventional gas well fee that is sold, 20260HB2129PN2755 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assigned or refunded.§ 4305. Registration.(a) Application.--(1) Before a producer severs natural gas or continues to sever natural gas in this Commonwealth after the date occurring 60 days following the effective date of this section, the producer shall apply to the department for a registration certificate.(2) The department may charge an application fee to cover the administrative costs associated with the application and registration process. The fee shall not exceed 3¢ per mcf of severed natural gas.(b) Issuance.--(1) Except as provided in subsection (c), after the receipt of an application and the required application fee, the department shall issue a registration certificate to the producer. The registration certificate is nonassignable.(2) A registrant shall renew the registration certificate on a staggered renewal system established by the department. After the initial staggered renewal period, a registration certificate is valid for a period of five years.(c) Refusal, suspension or revocation.--(1) The department may refuse to issue, suspend or revoke a registration certificate if the applicant or registrant has not filed required State tax reports and paid State taxes not subject to a timely perfected administrative or judicial appeal or an authorized deferred payment plan.(2) The department shall notify the applicant or registrant of a refusal, suspension or revocation. The notice shall contain a statement that the refusal, suspension or 20260HB2129PN2755 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revocation may be made public. The notice shall be made by first class mail.(3) An applicant or registrant aggrieved by the determination of the department may file an appeal under the provisions for administrative appeals in the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971. In the case of a suspension or revocation that is appealed, the registration certificate shall remain valid pending a final outcome of the appeals process. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if no appeal is taken or if an appeal is taken and denied at the conclusion of the appeal process, the department may disclose, by publication or otherwise, the identity of a producer and the fact that the producer's registration certificate has been refused, suspended or revoked under this subsection. Disclosure may include the basis for refusal, suspension or revocation.(d) Violation.--(1) A person that severs natural gas in this Commonwealth in violation of subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not less than $300 nor more than $1,500 or, in default of the payment, to imprisonment for not less than five days nor more than 30 days.(2) For purposes of this subsection, each day in which natural gas is severed shall constitute a separate violation.(3) The penalties imposed by this subsection shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by this chapter.(4) The secretary may designate employees of the department to enforce the provisions of this subsection. The employees shall exhibit proof of and be within the scope of 20260HB2129PN2755 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the designation when instituting proceedings as provided by the Pennsylvania Rules of Criminal Procedure.(e) Failure to obtain registration certificate.--Failure to obtain or hold a valid registration certificate does not relieve a person from liability for the tax imposed by this chapter.§ 4306. Meters.A producer shall provide for and maintain a discrete wellhead meter where natural gas is severed. A producer shall ensure that the meters are maintained according to industry standards. A wellhead meter installed after the effective date of this section shall be a digital meter.§ 4307. Assessments.(a) Authorization and requirement.--The department shall make inquiries, determinations and assessments of the tax imposed under this chapter, including interest, additions and penalties imposed under this chapter.(b) Notice.--The notice of assessment and demand for payment shall be mailed to the producer. The notice shall state the basis of the assessment. The department shall send the notice of assessment to the producer at the producer's registered post office address via mail if the assessment increases the producer's tax liability by $300 or more.§ 4308. Time for assessment.(a) Requirement.--(1) An assessment as provided under section 4307 (relating to assessments) shall be made within three years after the date when the report provided for under section 4303(g) (relating to imposition of tax) is filed or the end of the year in which the tax liability arises, whichever shall occur last.20260HB2129PN2755 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For purposes of this subsection and subsection (b), a return filed before the last day prescribed for the filing period shall be considered as filed on the last day.(b) Exception.--If the producer underpays the correct amount of the tax due by 25% or more, the tax may be assessed within six years after the date the return was filed.(c) Intent to evade.--Where no return is filed or where the producer files a false or fraudulent return with intent to evade the tax imposed by this chapter, the assessment may be made at any time.(d) Erroneous credit or refund.--Within three years of the granting of a refund or credit or within the period in which an assessment or reassessment may have been issued by the department for the taxable period for which the refund was granted, whichever period shall occur last, the department may issue an assessment to recover a refund or credit made or allowed erroneously.§ 4309. Extension of assessment period.Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the assessment period may be extended in the event a producer has provided written consent before the expiration of the period provided in section 4308 (relating to time for assessment) for a tax assessment. The amount of tax due may be assessed at any time within the extended period. The period may be extended further by subsequent written consents made before the expiration of the extended period.§ 4310. Reassessments.A producer against whom an assessment is made may petition the department for a reassessment under Article XXVII of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 20260HB2129PN2755 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1971.§ 4311. Interest.The department shall assess interest on any delinquent tax at the rate prescribed under section 806 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.§ 4312. Penalties.The department shall enforce the following penalties:(1) A penalty against a producer without a registration certificate required under section 4305 (relating to registration). The penalty shall be $1 for every unit severed without a valid registration certificate. The department may assess this penalty separately from or in conjunction with any assessment of the natural gas severance tax.(2) A penalty against a producer for failure to timely file a return as required under section 4303(g) (relating to imposition of tax). The penalty shall be 5% of the tax liability to be reported on the return for each day beyond the due date that the return is not filed.(3) In addition to the penalty under paragraph (2), a penalty against the producer for a willful failure to timely file a return. The penalty shall be 200% of the tax liability required to be reported on the return.(4) A penalty against a producer for failure to timely pay the tax as required under this chapter. The penalty shall be 5% of the amount of tax due for each day beyond the payment date that the tax is not paid.§ 4313. Administration of tax.Unless otherwise specified, Chapters IV, V, VI, VII and VIII of Part VI of Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, shall apply to this 20260HB2129PN2755 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter.§ 4314. Criminal acts.(a) Fraudulent return.--Any person with intent to defraud the Commonwealth, who willfully makes or causes to be made a return required under this chapter that is false, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $2,000 or to imprisonment for not more than three years, or both.(b) Other crimes.--(1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (a), a person is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 and costs of prosecution or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both, for any of the following:(i) Willfully failing to timely remit the tax to the department.(ii) Willfully failing or neglecting to timely file a return or report required by this chapter.(iii) Refusing to timely pay a tax, penalty or interest imposed or provided for by this chapter.(iv) Willfully failing to preserve the person's books, papers and records as directed by the department.(v) Refusing to permit the department or the person's authorized agents to examine the person's books, records or papers.(vi) Knowingly making any incomplete, false or fraudulent return or report.(vii) Preventing or attempting to prevent the full disclosure of the amount of natural gas severance tax due.20260HB2129PN2755 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Providing any person with a false statement as to the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter with respect to any pertinent facts.(ix) Making, uttering or issuing a false or fraudulent statement.(2) The penalties imposed under this section shall be in addition to other penalties imposed under this chapter.§ 4315. Abatement of additions or penalties.Upon the filing of a petition for reassessment or a petition for refund by a producer as provided under this chapter, additions or penalties imposed upon the producer by this chapter may be waived or abated, in whole or in part, where the petitioner establishes that he acted in good faith, without negligence and with no intent to defraud.§ 4316. Bulk and auction sales.A person that sells or causes to be sold at auction, or that sells or transfers in bulk, 51% or more of a stock of goods, wares or merchandise of any kind, fixtures, machinery, equipment, buildings or real estate involved in a business for which the person holds a registration certificate or is required to obtain a registration certificate under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of section 1403 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.§ 4317. Collection upon failure to request reassessment, review or appeal.(a) Power of department.--The department may collect the tax imposed under this chapter:(1) If an assessment of the tax is not paid within 30 days after notice to the producer when no petition for 20260HB2129PN2755 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reassessment has been filed.(2) Within 60 days of the reassessment, if no petition for review has been filed.(3) If no appeal has been made, within 30 days of:(i) the Board of Finance and Revenue's decision of a petition for review; or(ii) the expiration of the Board of Finance and Revenue's time for acting upon the petition.(4) In all cases of judicial sales, receiverships, assignments or bankruptcies.(b) Prohibition.--In a case for the collection of taxes under subsection (a), the producer against whom the taxes were assessed may not set up a ground of defense that might have been determined by the department, the Board of Finance and Revenue or the courts, provided that the defense of failure of the department to mail notice of assessment or reassessment to the producer and the defense of payment of assessment or reassessment may be raised in proceedings for collection by a motion to stay the proceedings.§ 4318. Tax liens.(a) Lien imposed.--(1) If a producer neglects or refuses to pay the tax imposed under this chapter for which the producer is liable under this chapter after demand, the amount, including interest, addition or penalty, together with additional costs that may accrue, shall be a lien in favor of the Commonwealth upon the real and personal property of the producer , but only after the same has been entered and docketed of record by the prothonotary of the county where the property is situated.(2) The department may, at any time, transmit to the 20260HB2129PN2755 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prothonotaries of the respective counties certified copies of the liens imposed under this section.(3) The prothonotary receiving the lien shall enter and docket the lien of record to the office of the prothonotary. The lien shall be indexed as judgments are now indexed. No prothonotary may require as a condition precedent to the entry of the lien the payment of costs incidental to its entry.(b) Priority of lien and effect on judicial sale.--(1) A lien imposed under this section shall have priority from the date of its recording and shall be fully paid and satisfied out of the proceeds of any judicial sale of property subject to the lien, before any other obligation, judgment, claim, lien or estate to which the property may subsequently become subject except as follows:(i) the costs of the sale;(ii) the writ upon which the sale was made;(iii) real estate taxes; and(iv) municipal claims against the property.(2) The lien shall be subordinate to mortgages and other liens existing and duly recorded or entered of record prior to the recording of the lien.(c) No discharge by sale on junior lien.--(1) In the case of a judicial sale of property subject to a lien imposed under this section, upon a lien or claim over which the lien imposed under this section has priority, the sale shall discharge the lien imposed under this section to the extent only that the proceeds are applied to its payment, and the lien shall continue in full force and effect as to the balance remaining unpaid.20260HB2129PN2755 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) There shall be no inquisition or condemnation upon any judicial sale of real estate made by the Commonwealth under the provisions of this chapter.(3) The lien shall continue as provided in the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, and a writ of execution may directly issue upon the lien without the issuance and prosecution to judgment of a writ of scire facias, provided that not less than 10 days before issuance of any execution on the lien, notice of the filing and the effect of the lien shall be sent by registered mail to the producer's last known post office address. The lien shall have no effect upon any stock of goods, wares or merchandise regularly sold or leased in the ordinary course of business by the producer against whom the lien has been entered, unless and until a writ of execution has been issued and a levy made upon the stock of goods, wares and merchandise.(d) Penalty.--A prothonotary who intentionally violates this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 and costs of prosecution or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(e) Priority.--(1) Except as provided in this chapter, in the case of the distribution, voluntary or compulsory, in receivership, bankruptcy or otherwise of the property or estate of a person, all taxes imposed by this chapter that are due and unpaid and are not collectible under the provisions of section 225 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, shall be paid from the first 20260HB2129PN2755 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 money available for distribution in priority to all other claims and liens, except as the laws of the United States may give priority to a claim to the Federal Government.(2) A person charged with the administration or distribution of the property or estate who violates the provisions of this section shall be personally liable for the taxes imposed by this chapter that are accrued and unpaid and chargeable against the person whose property or estate is being administered or distributed.(f) Other remedies.--Subject to the limitations contained in this chapter as to the assessment of taxes, nothing contained in this section may be construed to restrict, prohibit or limit the use by the department in collecting taxes due and payable of another remedy or procedure available at law or equity for the collection of debts.§ 4319. Tax suit reciprocity.The courts of this Commonwealth shall recognize and enforce liabilities for natural gas severance or extraction taxes lawfully imposed by any other state, if the other state recognizes and enforces the tax imposed under this chapter.§ 4320. Service.A producer is deemed to have appointed the Secretary of the Commonwealth as the producer's agent for the acceptance of service of process or notice in a proceeding for the enforcement of the civil provisions of this chapter. Service made upon the Secretary of the Commonwealth as agent shall be of the same legal force and validity as if the service had been personally made on the producer. Where service cannot be made upon the producer in the manner provided by other laws of this Commonwealth relating to service of process, service may be made 20260HB2129PN2755 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 upon the Secretary of the Commonwealth. In that case, a copy of the process or notice shall be personally served upon any agent or representative of the producer who may be found within this Commonwealth or, where no agent or representative may be found, a copy of the process or notice shall be sent via registered mail to the producer at the last known address of the producer's principal place of business, home office or residence.§ 4321. Refunds.(a) Taxes, interest and penalties.--Under Article XXVII of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the department shall refund all taxes, interest and penalties paid to the Commonwealth under the provisions of this chapter to which the Commonwealth is not rightfully entitled. The refunds shall be made to the person or the person's heirs, successors, assigns or other personal representatives who paid the tax, provided that no refund may be made under this section regarding a payment made by reason of an assessment where a producer has filed a petition for reassessment under section 2702 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 to the extent the petition is adverse to the producer by a decision that is no longer subject to further review or appeal.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit a producer that has filed a timely petition for reassessment from amending it to a petition for refund where the petitioner paid the tax assessed.§ 4322. Refund petition.(a) Petition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the refund or credit of tax, interest or penalty provided under section 4321 (relating to refunds) shall be made only where the person who has paid the tax files a petition for refund with the 20260HB2129PN2755 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department under Article XXVII of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, within the time limits of section 3003.1 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(b) Natural gas severance tax.--(1) A refund or credit of tax, interest or penalty paid as a result of an assessment made by the department under section 4307 (relating to assessments) shall be made only where the person who has paid the tax files a petition for a refund with the department under Article XXVII of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 within the time limits of section 3003.1 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(2) The filing of a petition for refund under the provisions of this subsection shall not affect the abatement of interest, additions or penalties to which the person may be entitled by reason of payment of the assessment.§ 4323. Rules and regulations.The department shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall promulgate rules and regulations to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the collection of taxes, penalties and interest imposed by this chapter. The department may prescribe the extent, if any, to which any of the rules and regulations shall be applied without retroactive effect.§ 4324. Recordkeeping.(a) Duties.--A person liable for any tax imposed by this chapter, or for the collection of the tax, shall keep records, including those enumerated in subsection (b), render statements, make returns and comply with the rules and regulations as the department may prescribe regarding matters pertinent to the person's business. Whenever it is necessary, the department may 20260HB2129PN2755 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 require a person, by notice served upon the person or by regulations, to make returns, render statements or keep records as the department deems sufficient to show whether a person is liable to pay tax under this chapter.(b) Records.--Records to be maintained are:(1) Wellhead meter charts for each reporting period and the meter calibration and maintenance records. If turbine meters are in use, the maintenance records shall be made available to the department upon request.(2) Records, statements and other instruments furnished to a producer by a person to whom the producer delivers for sale, transport or delivery of natural gas.(3) Records, statements and other instruments as the department may prescribe by regulation.(c) Records of nonresidents.--(1) A nonresident who does business in this Commonwealth as a producer shall keep adequate records of the business and of the tax due as a result. The records shall be retained within this Commonwealth unless retention outside this Commonwealth is authorized by the department.(2) The department may require a producer that desires to retain records outside this Commonwealth to assume reasonable out-of-State audit expenses.(d) Keeping of separate records.--(1) A producer that is engaged in another business or businesses that do not involve the severing of natural gas taxable under this chapter shall keep separate books and records of the businesses so as to show the taxable severing of natural gas under this chapter separately from other business activities not taxable under this chapter.20260HB2129PN2755 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If a person fails to keep separate books and records, the person shall be liable for a penalty equaling 100% of tax due under this chapter for the period where separate records were not maintained.§ 4325. Examinations.(a) Right to examine.--(1) The department or any of its authorized agents may examine the books, papers, records and locations of a producer in order to verify the accuracy and completeness of a return made or, if no return was made, to ascertain and assess the tax imposed by this chapter. The department may require the preservation of all books, papers and records for any period deemed proper by the department but not to exceed three years from the end of the calendar year to which the records relate.(2) A producer shall give to the department or its agent the means, facilities and opportunity for examinations and investigations under this section.(3) The department may examine a person, under oath, concerning the taxable severing of natural gas by a producer or concerning any other matter relating to the enforcement or administration of this chapter, and to this end may compel the production of books, papers and records and the attendance of all persons whether as parties or witnesses believed to have knowledge of relevant matters.(b) Procedure.--The procedure for the hearings or examinations shall be the same as that provided under the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.§ 4326. Unauthorized disclosure.(a) Confidentiality.--Information gained by the department 20260HB2129PN2755 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as a result of a return, examination, investigation, hearing or verification required or authorized under this chapter shall be confidential except for official purposes and except in accordance with proper judicial order or as otherwise provided by law.(b) Penalty.--Any person unlawfully divulging the information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 and costs of prosecution or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.§ 4327. Cooperation with other governments.Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4319 (relating to tax suit reciprocity), the department may permit the Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service, the proper officer of any state or the authorized representative of either of them to inspect the tax returns of a producer, or may furnish to the commissioner or officer or to either of their authorized representatives an abstract of the return of a producer, or supply the officer or the officer's authorized representative with information concerning any item contained in a return or disclosed by the report of any examination or investigation of the return of a producer. This permission shall be granted only if the laws of the United States or another state grant substantially similar privileges to the proper officer of the Commonwealth charged with the administration of this chapter.§ 4328. Bonds.(a) Producer to file bond.--(1) The department may require a nonresident natural person, or any foreign corporation, association, fiduciary or other entity, not authorized to do business within this 20260HB2129PN2755 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth or not having an established place of business in this Commonwealth and subject to the tax imposed by section 4303 (relating to imposition of tax), to file a bond issued by a surety company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and approved by the Insurance Commissioner as to solvency and responsibility, in amounts as the department may fix, to secure the payment of any tax or penalties due or that may become due from a nonresident natural person, corporation, association, fiduciary or other entity whenever the department deems it necessary to protect the revenues obtained under this chapter.(2) The department may also require a bond of a person petitioning the department for reassessment in the case of any assessment over $500 or where, in the department's opinion, the ultimate collection is in jeopardy.(3) For a period of three years, the department may require a bond of any person that has, on three or more occasions within a 12-month period, either filed a return or made payment to the department more than 30 days late.(4) In the event the department determines a producer is required to file a bond, the department shall give notice to the producer specifying the amount of the bond required. (5) The producer shall file the bond within five days after notice is given by the department unless, within five days, the producer requests in writing a hearing before the secretary or the secretary's representative.(6) At the hearing, the necessity, propriety and amount of the bond shall be determined by the secretary or the secretary's representative.(7) The determination shall be final and the producer 20260HB2129PN2755 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall comply within 15 days after notice is mailed to the producer . (b) Securities in lieu of bond.--(1) In lieu of the bond required under this section, securities approved by the department or cash in a prescribed amount may be deposited. The securities or cash shall be kept in the custody of the department.(2) The department may:(i) Apply the securities or cash to the tax imposed under this chapter and interest or penalties due without notice to the depositor.(ii) Sell the securities to pay the tax and interest or penalties due at public or private sale upon five days' written notice to the depositor.(c) Failure to file bond.--(1) The department may file a lien under section 4318 (relating to tax liens) against any producer who fails to file a bond when required to do so under this section.(2) All funds received upon execution of the judgment on the lien shall be refunded to the producer with 3% interest should a final determination be made that the producer does not owe any payment to the department.§ 4329. Prohibition.A producer may not make the tax imposed under section 4303 (relating to imposition of tax) on natural gas severed under a natural gas lease, an obligation, indebtedness or liability of a landowner, leaseholder or other person in possession of real property upon which the removal or extraction occurs and shall not otherwise require the landowner to pay or reimburse the producer for the amount of the tax.20260HB2129PN2755 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4330. Future agreements.On or after the effective date of this section, a provision of an agreement in violation of section 4329 (relating to prohibition) is declared to be illegal, contrary to public policy and null and void.§ 4331. Stripper wells.Notwithstanding the definition of "stripper well" in section 2301 (relating to definitions) or any other provision of Chapter 23 (relating to unconventional gas well fee) to the contrary, a stripper well shall only be exempt from the payment of the unconventional gas well fee due under Chapter 23 if the well was incapable of producing more than 90 units of natural gas each day of every calendar month in a calendar year.§ 4332. Deposit of proceeds.The proceeds of the tax imposed under section 4303 (relating to imposition of tax) and penalties and interest imposed under this chapter shall be deposited into the General Fund . Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2129PN2755 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718